Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.156.040

Gifts, grants, donations.

The joint center for deployment and research in earth-abundant materials may solicit and receive gifts, grants, donations, sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local governmental agency or program or any private source and expend the same for any purpose consistent with this chapter. Members and employees associated with the joint center for deployment and research in earth-abundant materials are presumed not to be in violation of solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in RCW 42.52.150.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 20 s 5.]